Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1241.07
Motorboat
or personal watercraft; age restriction on lease, hire, or rental; restriction
on operation; duties of owner,
agent, or employee.

(1) The owner of a boat livery, or his or her
agent or employee, shall not lease, hire, or rent a motorboat or personal
watercraft to any person under eighteen years of age.

(2) Except
as provided in subdivision (1)(a) of section 37-1241.06, a person younger
than eighteen years of age may operate a motorboat or personal watercraft
rented, leased, or hired by a person eighteen years of age or older if the
person younger than eighteen years of age holds a valid boating safety certificate
issued under section 37-1241.06.

(3) The owner
of a boat livery, or his or her agent or employee, engaged in the business
of renting or leasing motorboats shall list on each rental or lease agreement
for a motorboat the name and age of each person who is authorized to operate
the motorboat. The person to whom the motorboat is rented or leased shall
ensure that only those persons who are listed as authorized operators are
allowed to operate the motorboat.

(4) The owner of a boat livery, or his or her agent
or employee, engaged in the business of renting or leasing motorboats shall
display for review by each person who is authorized to operate the motorboat
a summary of the statutes and the rules and regulations governing the operation
of a motorboat and instructions regarding the safe operation of the motorboat.
Each person who is listed as an authorized operator of the motorboat shall
review the summary of the statutes, rules, regulations, and instructions and
sign a statement indicating that he or she has done so prior to leaving the
rental or leasing office.

Laws 1999, LB 176, § 108;

Laws 2003, LB 305, § 23;

Laws 2005, LB 21, § 1;

Laws 2009, LB105, § 36.